Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 5. Transportation Trust Fund.

§ 33.2-1524.
Commonwealth Transportation Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Commonwealth Transportation Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller. Any moneys remaining in the Fund at the end of the year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. The Fund shall consist of all funds appropriated to the Fund and all funds dedicated to the Fund pursuant to law, including:

Revenues pursuant to §§

58.1-2289

and

58.1-2701

;

Revenues pursuant to subsections A and G of §

58.1-638

and §

58.1-638.3

;

Tolls and other revenues derived from the projects financed or refinanced pursuant to this title that are payable into the state treasury and tolls and other revenues derived from other transportation projects, which may include upon the request of the applicable appointed local governing body, as soon as their obligations have been satisfied, such tolls and revenue derived for transportation projects pursuant to the Chesapeake Bay Bridge and Tunnel District and Commission established in Chapter 22 (§

33.2-2200

et seq.) and to the Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority established in Chapter 29 (§

33.2-2900

et seq.), or if the appointed local governing body requests refunding or advanced refunding by the Board and such refunding or advanced refunding is approved by the General Assembly. Such funds shall be held in separate subaccounts of the Commonwealth Transportation Fund to the extent required by law or the Board;

Revenues pursuant to §

58.1-2425

;

Revenues pursuant to subdivisions A 1 through 12 of § 46.2-694 and §§ 46.2-694.1, 46.2-697, and 46.2-697.2, except where provided elsewhere in such sections and excluding revenues deposited into a special fund for the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-686;

Revenues pursuant to §

58.1-1741

;

Revenues pursuant to §

58.1-815.4

;

Revenues from §

58.1-2249

;

Such other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly from time to time and designated for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund;

All interest, dividends, and appreciation that may accrue to the Transportation Trust Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

and the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

;

All amounts required by contract to be paid over to the Commonwealth Transportation Fund;

Concession payments paid to the Commonwealth by a private entity pursuant to the Public-Private Transportation Act of 1995 (§

33.2-1800

et seq.); and

Revenues pursuant to §

58.1-2531

.

Funds in the Fund shall be distributed as follows:

Of the funds from subdivisions A 1, 2, 4 through 8, and 13: (i) 51 percent to the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

and (ii) 49 percent to the Transportation Trust Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

;

The funds from subdivisions A 3 and 12 shall be deposited into the Transportation Trust Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

;

Of the funds from subdivision A 10: (i) two-thirds shall be deposited in the Virginia Transportation Infrastructure Bank established pursuant to Article 1 (§

33.2-1500

et seq.) and (ii) one-third shall be deposited into the Transportation Partnership Opportunity Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1529.1

.

From funds available pursuant to subsection B, (i) $40 million annually shall be deposited into the Route 58 Corridor Development Fund pursuant to §

33.2-2300

, (ii) $40 million annually shall be deposited into the Northern Virginia Transportation District Fund pursuant to §

33.2-2400

, and (iii) $80 million annually shall be deposited into the Special Structure Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1532

, though the amount deposited shall be adjusted annually based on the change in the United States Average Consumer Price Index for all items, all urban consumers (CPI-U), as published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the U.S. Department of Labor. Such deposits may be made in one or more installments.

History.

1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, § 33.1-23.03:1; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1991, cc. 666, 713; 1992, c. 108; 1993, c. 793; 2006, c. 922; 2009, c. 471; 2014, c. 805; 2014, cc. 469, 805; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Cross references.

As to inclusion of amounts proposed to be diverted from the Transportation Trust Fund and Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund in the Budget Bill submitted pursuant to §

2.2-1509

, along with
a plan for repayment, see §

2.2-1509

.2.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 469 amended former § 33.1-23.03:1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to
§ 30-152, the
2014 amendment by c. 469 has been given effect in this section by substituting “Richmond Metropolitan Transportation Authority” for “Richmond Metropolitan Authority” in subdivision 3.

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 11 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (i) shall take actions deemed necessary in fiscal years 2021, 2022 and 2023 to ensure appropriate coverage ratios for any outstanding debt backed by the Transportation Trust Fund and (ii) shall ensure funds for modal programs and the highway maintenance and operating fund are at least equal to the amounts provided for the six-year financial plan for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund as in effect on January 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 13 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (i) shall take actions deemed necessary in fiscal years 2021, 2022 and 2023 to ensure appropriate coverage ratios for any outstanding debt backed by the Transportation Trust Fund and (ii) shall ensure funds for modal programs and the highway maintenance and operating fund are at least equal to the amounts provided for the six-year financial plan for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund as in effect on January 1, 2020.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, added subsection A designator, inserted “Commonwealth” preceding “Transportation,” deleted “Trust” preceding “Fund,” substituted “(the Fund)” for “consisting of,” and added remaining sentences in subsection A; substituted “Revenues pursuant to §§

58.1-2289

and

58.1-2701

” for “Funds remaining for highway construction purposes among the highway systems pursuant to” in subsection A 1; substituted Revenues pursuant to subsections A and G of §

58.1-638

and §

58.1-638.3

“ for ”The additional revenues generated by enactments of Chapters 11, 12, and 15 of the 1986 Acts of Assembly, Special Session I, and designated for this fund“ in subdivision A 2”; inserted “Commonwealth” preceding “Transportation” and deleted “Trust” preceding “Fund” in subdivision A 3; added subdivisions A 4 through A 8; added subdivision A 9 designator; substituted subdivision A 10 designator for A 5 designator; inserted “established pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

” following “Transportation Trust Fund,” and inserted “established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

” following “Operating Fund” in subdivision A 10; substituted subdivision A 11 designator for subdivision A 6 designator, inserted “Commonwealth” preceding “Transportation,” and deleted “Trust” preceding “Fund”; substituted subdivision A 12 designator for subdivision A 7 designator and inserted “and” preceding “(§

33.2-1800

et seq.)”; added subdivision A 13, added subsection B and subdivisions B 1 through B 3, and added subsection C; and made minor stylistic changes.

§ 33.2-1524.1.
Transportation Trust Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of Treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Transportation Trust Fund, consisting of funds distributed from the Commonwealth Transportation Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1524

. The revenues deposited pursuant to subdivision B 1 of §

33.2-1524

shall be distributed during the year to result in the following:

For construction programs pursuant to §

33.2-358

, 53 percent;

To the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526

, 23 percent;

To the Commonwealth Rail Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.4

, 7.5 percent;

To the Commonwealth Port Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.5

, 2.5 percent;

To the Commonwealth Aviation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.6

, 1.5 percent;

To the Commonwealth Space Flight Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.7

, one percent;

To the Priority Transportation Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1527

, 10.5 percent; and

To a special fund within the Commonwealth Transportation Fund in the state treasury, one percent to be used to meet the necessary expenses of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 11 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (i) shall take actions deemed necessary in fiscal years 2021, 2022 and 2023 to ensure appropriate coverage ratios for any outstanding debt backed by the Transportation Trust Fund and (ii) shall ensure funds for modal programs and the highway maintenance and operating fund are at least equal to the amounts provided for the six-year financial plan for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund as in effect on January 1, 2020.”

§ 33.2-1525.
Administration of Transportation Trust Fund.

The Transportation Trust Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller so as to segregate the amounts appropriated to the Transportation Trust Fund and the amounts earned or accumulated by such Transportation Trust Fund. No portion of the Transportation Trust Fund shall be used for a purpose other than as provided in this section. Any moneys remaining in the Transportation Trust Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Transportation Trust Fund to be used for the purposes set forth in §§

33.2-1524

,

33.2-1526

, and

33.2-1529

and shall accumulate interest and dividends throughout the existence of the Transportation Trust Fund. Whenever in the Board’s opinion there are moneys in the Transportation Trust Fund in excess of the amount required to meet the current needs and demands of the transportation program, the Board may invest such excess funds in securities that, in its judgment, will be readily convertible into money. Such securities may include debentures and other government and corporate obligations; common and preferred stocks limited to 30 percent of total trust funds investments based on cost; “prime quality” commercial paper, as defined and limited by §

2.2-4502

; bankers’ acceptances; bonds; money market funds; and overnight, term, and open repurchase agreements. The investment of moneys held in the Transportation Trust Fund shall be administered by the state treasury under guidelines adopted by the Board pursuant to this section.The Treasurer may, at his option, manage such moneys or hire professional outside investment counsel to manage part or all of such moneys.The selection of services related to the management, purchase, or sale of authorized investments shall be governed by the standard provided in this section and shall not be subject to the provisions of Chapter 43 (§

2.2-4300

et seq.) of Title 2.2.

When investments are made in accordance with this section, no member of the Board, Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, or Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission; employee of the Board, Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission, Department of Transportation, or Department of Rail and Public Transportation; or treasury official shall be personally liable for any loss therefrom in the absence of negligence, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance.

History.

1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, §§ 33.1-23.03:5, 33.1-23.03:7; 2013, cc. 585, 646; 2014, c. 805; 2016, cc. 603, 608.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2016, cc. 603 and
608, cl. 2 provides: “That no provision of this act shall result in the expiration of any provision of (i) Chapter 896 of the Acts of Assembly of 2007 pursuant to the 22nd enactment of that chapter or (ii) Chapter 766 of the Acts of Assembly of 2013 pursuant to the 14th enactment of that chapter.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 453 A, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the highway share of the Transportation Trust Fund shall be used for highway maintenance and operation purposes prior to its availability for new development, acquisition, and construction.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 453 I, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, the Commonwealth Transportation Commissioner may enter into a contract with homeowner associations for grounds-keeping, mowing, and litter removal services.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 603 and 608 are identical, and in subsection B, substituted “no member of the Board, Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, or Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission; employee of the Board, Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, Hampton Roads Transportation Accountability Commission” for “no Board member, Board employee,” and deleted “employee” following “Department of Transportation” and “Public Transportation.”

§ 33.2-1526.
Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be a part of the Transportation Trust Fund and shall be known as the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and any funds remaining in the Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall be credited to the Fund.

The amounts allocated to the Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1526.1

shall be used to support the operating, capital, and administrative costs of public transportation at a state share determined by the Board, and such amounts may be used to support the capital project costs of public transportation and ridesharing equipment, facilities, and associated costs at a state share determined by the Board. Capital costs may include debt service payments on local or agency transit bonds.

History.

1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13, § 33.1-23.03:2; 1998, cc. 905, 907; 2012, cc. 779, 817; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2016, cc. 299, 345; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 substituted “subsection C or D” for “subsection C” in the last sentence.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 299 and 345 are identical, and substituted “2023-2024” for “2016-2017,” and “$15.8 million” for “$9.5 million” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and rewrote the section.

§ 33.2-1526.1.
Use of the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund.

All funds deposited pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

into the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund (the Fund), established pursuant to §

33.2-1526

, shall be allocated as set forth in this section.

From funds available pursuant to subsection D, beginning in fiscal year 2022, up to $50 million shall be allocated to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority as matching funds to federal and other funds provided by the Federal Transit Administration, the District of Columbia, and the State of Maryland. However, such funds shall only be provided if the District of Columbia and the State of Maryland each provide an amount equal to one-third of the funding provided by the Federal Transit Administration to the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority. The funds provided by the Commonwealth shall not exceed the funds provided by the District of Columbia or the State of Maryland.

The Board may establish policies for the implementation of this section, including the determination of the state share of operating, capital, and administrative costs related to mass transit. For purposes of this section, capital costs may include debt service payments on local or agency transit bonds. Funds may be paid to any local governing body, transportation district commission, or public service corporation for the purposes as set forth in this section. No funds from the Fund shall be allocated without a local match from the recipient.

Each year the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall make recommendations to the Board for the allocation of funds from the Fund. Such recommendations, and the final allocations approved by the Board, shall adhere to the following:

Twenty-seven percent of the funds shall be allocated to support operating costs of transit providers and shall be distributed by the Board on the basis of service delivery factors, based on effectiveness and efficiency as established by the Board. Such measures and their relative weight shall be evaluated every three years and, if redefined by the Board, shall be published and made available for public comment at least one year in advance of being applied. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) shall not be eligible for an allocation of funds pursuant to this subdivision.

Eighteen percent of the funds shall be allocated for capital purposes and distributed utilizing the transit capital prioritization process established by the Board pursuant to §

33.2-214.4

. The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority shall not be eligible for an allocation of funds pursuant to this subdivision.

Forty-six and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated to the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission for distribution to WMATA for capital purposes and operating assistance, as determined by the Commission.

Six percent of the funds shall be allocated by the Board for the Transit Ridership Incentive Program established pursuant to §

33.2-1526.3

.

Two and one-half percent of the funds shall be allocated for special programs, including ridesharing, transportation demand management programs, experimental transit, public transportation promotion, operation studies, and technical assistance, and may be allocated to any local governing body, planning district commission, transportation district commission, or public transit corporation. Remaining funds may also be used directly by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation to (i) finance a program administered by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation designed to promote the use of public transportation and ridesharing throughout the Commonwealth or (ii) finance up to 80 percent of the cost of development and implementation of projects with a purpose of enhancing the provision and use of public transportation services.

The Board may consider the transfer of funds from subdivisions D 2 and 5 to subdivision D 1 in times of statewide economic distress or statewide special need.

The Department of Rail and Public Transportation may reserve a balance of up to five percent of the Fund revenues in order to ensure stability in providing operating and capital funding to transit entities from year to year, provided that such balance shall not exceed five percent of revenues in a given biennium.

The Board may allocate up to 3.5 percent of the funds set aside for the Fund to support costs of project development, project administration, and project compliance incurred by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation in implementing rail, public transportation, and congestion management grants and programs.

Funds allocated to the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission (NVTC) for WMATA pursuant to subdivision D 3 shall be credited to the Counties of Arlington and Fairfax and the Cities of Alexandria, Fairfax, and Falls Church. Beginning in the fiscal year when service starts on Phase II of the Silver Line, such funds shall also be credited to Loudoun County. Funds allocated pursuant to this subsection shall be credited as follows:

Local obligations for debt service for WMATA rail transit bonds apportioned to each locality using WMATA’s capital formula shall be paid first by NVTC, which shall use 95 percent state aid for these payments.

The remaining funds shall be apportioned to reflect WMATA’s allocation formulas by using the related WMATA-allocated subsidies and relative shares of local transit subsidies. Capital costs shall include 20 percent of annual local bus capital expenses. Local transit subsidies and local capital costs of Loudoun County shall not be included. Hold harmless protections and obligations for NVTC’s jurisdictions agreed to by NVTC on November 5, 1998, shall remain in effect.

Appropriations from the Fund are intended to provide a stable and reliable source of revenue, as defined by P.L. 96-184.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, funds allocated to WMATA may be disbursed by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation directly to WMATA or to any other transportation entity that has an agreement to provide funding to WMATA.

In any year that the total Virginia operating assistance in the approved WMATA budget increases by more than three percent from the total operating assistance in the prior year’s approved WMATA budget, the Board shall withhold an amount equal to 35 percent of the funds available under subdivision D 3. The following items shall not be included in the calculation of any WMATA budget increase: (i) any service, equipment, or facility that is required by any applicable law, rule, or regulation; (ii) any capital project approved by the WMATA Board before or after the effective date of this provision; (iii) any payments or obligations of any kind arising from or related to legal disputes or proceedings between or among WMATA and any other person or entity; and (iv) any service increases approved by the WMATA Board.

The Board shall withhold 20 percent of the funds available pursuant to subdivision D 3 if (i) any alternate directors participate or take action at an official WMATA Board meeting or committee meeting as Board directors for a WMATA compact member when both directors appointed by that same WMATA compact member are present at the WMATA Board meeting or committee meeting or (ii) the WMATA Board of Directors has not adopted bylaws that would prohibit such participation by alternate directors.

History.

2018, cc. 854, 856; 2020, cc. 1133, 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 7 was codified as subsection K of this section at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 8 provides: “That, beginning July 1, 2019, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (the Board) shall withhold 20 percent of the funds available pursuant to subdivision C 3 of
§

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, each year unless (i) the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (WMATA) has adopted a detailed capital improvement program covering the current fiscal year and, at a minimum, the next five fiscal years, and at least one public hearing on such capital improvement program has been held in a locality embraced by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission, and (ii) WMATA has adopted or updated a strategic plan within the preceding 36 months, and at least one public hearing on such plan or updated plan has been held in a locality embraced by the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission. In order to satisfy the requirements of clause (ii) of this enactment, the first strategic plan adopted to comply with such requirements shall include a plan to align services with demand and to satisfy the other recommendations included in the report submitted pursuant to Item 436 R of Chapter 836 of the Acts of Assembly of 2017.”

Acts
2018, cc. 854 and
856, cl. 11 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision C 1 of
§

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, for fiscal year 2019 the funds allocated to support the operating costs of transit shall be distributed as follows: (i) the first $54 million of such funds shall be distributed to each transit property in the same proportion as its operating expenses bear to the total statewide operating expenses and shall be spent for purposes deemed to be eligible by the Board and (ii) the remaining amount of such funds shall be allocated to support operating costs of transit providers and shall be distributed by the Board on the basis of service delivery factors, based on effectiveness and efficiency, as established by the Board.”

Acts
2019, cc. 551 and
567 provides: “§ 1. The Commonwealth Transportation Board may allocate supplemental operating funds in fiscal year 2020 to any transit provider that receives funds to support operating costs pursuant to subdivision C 1 of
§

33.2-1526.1

of the Code of Virginia and that is negatively impacted by a loss of operating funds as a direct result of the performance-based allocation process set forth in Chapter 854 of the Acts of Assembly of 2018. The maximum amount of supplemental operating funds available pursuant to this authorization shall not exceed $3 million from the nongeneral fund amounts available to the Department of Rail and Public Transportation.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 1133, added clause (iv) in subsection J; and made stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, substituted “§

33.2-1524.1

” for “§§

58.1-638

,

58.1-638

.3,

58.1-815.4

, and

58.1-2289

” and substituted “§

33.2-1526

” for “subdivision A 4 of § 58.1-638” in subsection A; added subsection B and redesignated the remaining subsections as subsections C through L; substituted “Twenty-seven” for “Thirty-seven” in subdivision D 1; substituted “Eighteen” for “Twelve and one-half” in subdivision D 2; substituted “Forty-six and one-half percent” for “Fifty-three and one-half percent” in subdivision D 3; added subdivision D 4; redesignated former subdivision D 4 as subdivision D 5; and, in subdivision D 5, substituted “Two and one-half percent” for “Three”; substituted “subdivisions D 2” for “subdivisions C,” substituted “subdivisions D 5” for “subdivisions 4,” and substituted “subdivision D” for “subdivision C” in subsection E; substituted “subdivision D 3” for “subdivision C 3” in subsection G; substituted “three percent” for “3 percent,” and substituted “subdivision D 3” for “subdivision C 3” in subsection K; and substituted “subdivision D 3” for “subdivision C 3” in subsection L.

§ 33.2-1526.2.
Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund known as the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund. The Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund shall be a subaccount of the Commonwealth Mass Transit Fund.

The Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund subaccount shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and consist of such moneys as are appropriated to it by the General Assembly and of all donations, gifts, bequests, grants, endowments, and other moneys given, bequeathed, granted, or otherwise made available to the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund. Any funds remaining in the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the general fund, but shall remain in the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund. Interest earned on funds within the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund shall remain in and be credited to the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund.

Proceeds of the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund may be paid to any political subdivision, another public entity created by an act of the General Assembly, or a private entity as defined in §

33.2-1800

and for purposes as enumerated in subdivision 7 of §

33.2-1701

or expended by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation for the purposes specified in this subsection. Revenues of the Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund shall be used to support capital expenditures involving the establishment, improvement, or expansion of public transportation services through specific projects approved by the Commonwealth Transportation Board.

The Commonwealth Transit Capital Fund shall not be allocated without requiring a local match from the recipient.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2020, c. 1289, Item 443 D, as amended by Acts
2020, Sp. Sess. I, c. 56, and as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of
§

33.2-1526.2

C, the distribution of funds in the Commonwealth Rail Fund shall be:

“1. Remaining balances as of June 30, 2020 in the Rail Enhancement Fund pursuant to § 33.2- 1601 and the Intercity Rail Operating and Capital Fund pursuant to
§ 3.2-1603 shall be transferred to the Commonwealth Rail Fund.

“2. In order to facilitate the financing activities of the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority, all cash balances as of July 1, 2020 shall be transferred to the Authority from the Commonwealth Rail Fund. This transfer shall not be transacted until after an agreement has been fully executed between the Department and the Authority that requires funds to be transferred from the Authority to the Department for the prompt payment of any expenditures on the projects administered by the Department.

“3. During the interim period between July 1, 2020, and the formal establishment of the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority (Authority), the Department shall be responsible for conducting all necessary business functions assigned to the Authority. Formal establishment shall include appointments to the Authority’s board of directors, a formal meeting of the board, the hiring of an executive director, and the execution of the agreement required in subparagraph D.2.”

§ 33.2-1526.3.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Transit Ridership Incentive Program.

The Board shall establish the Transit Ridership Incentive Program (the Program) to promote improved transit service in urbanized areas of the Commonwealth with a population in excess of 100,000 and to reduce barriers to transit use for low-income individuals.

The goal of the Program shall be to encourage the identification and establishment of routes of regional significance, the development and implementation of a regional subsidy allocation model, implementation of integrated fare collection, establishment of bus-only lanes on routes of regional significance, and other actions and service determined by the Board to improve transit service.

The Board shall establish guidelines for the implementation of the Program and review such guidelines, at a minimum, every five years. The funds in the Program shall be awarded such that on a five-year rolling average, the amount of funds awarded to each urbanized area shall be equal to a ratio of the population within the Commonwealth of such urbanized area compared to the total population within the Commonwealth of all eligible urbanized areas. The Board may through an affirmative vote of a majority of the members vote to waive this requirement for a period not to exceed two years when they find there is a need that justifies such waiver.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Board shall use at least 25 percent of the funds available to support the establishment of programs to reduce the impact of fares on low-income individuals, including reduced-fare programs and elimination of fares. The restrictions in subsection A shall not apply to funds used pursuant to this subsection, nor shall the funds used pursuant to this subsection be used to calculate the rolling average described in subsection C.

The Board shall use at least 25 percent of the funds available to support regional transit initiatives. The Board shall use its discretion in allocating the remaining funds available as authorized pursuant to this section and based on the programs and initiatives submitted during the application process.

The Board shall report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the projects and services funded by the Program. The report shall, at a minimum, include an analysis of the performance of the funded projects, the performance of the identified routes of regional significance, transit ridership, efforts funded pursuant to subsection D, and any other information the Board determines to be appropriate.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275; 2022, cc. 719, 745.

Editor's note.

Acts
2022, c. 719, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending the first sentence of subsection D of
§

33.2-1526.3

of the Code of Virginia shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

Acts
2022, c. 745, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending subsection D of
§

33.2-1526.3

of the Code of Virginia shall expire on July 1, 2024.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 719, in subsection D, substituted “use at least 25 percent” for “use an amount not to exceed 25 percent” in the first sentence and added “nor shall the funds used pursuant to this subsection be used to calculate the rolling average described in subsection C.” in the second sentence.

§ 33.2-1526.3.
(Effective July 1, 2024) Transit Ridership Incentive Program.

The Board shall establish the Transit Ridership Incentive Program (the Program) to promote improved transit service in urbanized areas of the Commonwealth with a population in excess of 100,000 and to reduce barriers to transit use for low-income individuals.

The goal of the Program shall be to encourage the identification and establishment of routes of regional significance, the development and implementation of a regional subsidy allocation model, implementation of integrated fare collection, establishment of bus-only lanes on routes of regional significance, and other actions and service determined by the Board to improve transit service.

The Board shall establish guidelines for the implementation of the Program and review such guidelines, at a minimum, every five years. The funds in the Program shall be awarded such that on a five-year rolling average, the amount of funds awarded to each urbanized area shall be equal to a ratio of the population within the Commonwealth of such urbanized area compared to the total population within the Commonwealth of all eligible urbanized areas. The Board may through an affirmative vote of a majority of the members vote to waive this requirement for a period not to exceed two years when they find there is a need that justifies such waiver.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, the Board shall use an amount not to exceed 25 percent of the funds available to support the establishment of programs to reduce the impact of fares on low-income individuals, including reduced-fare programs and elimination of fares. The restrictions in subsection A shall not apply to funds used pursuant to this subsection, nor shall the funds used pursuant to this subsection be used to calculate the rolling average described in subsection C.

The Board shall use at least 25 percent of the funds available to support regional transit initiatives. The Board shall use its discretion in allocating the remaining funds available as authorized pursuant to this section and based on the programs and initiatives submitted during the application process.

The Board shall report annually to the Governor and the General Assembly on the projects and services funded by the Program. The report shall, at a minimum, include an analysis of the performance of the funded projects, the performance of the identified routes of regional significance, transit ridership, efforts funded pursuant to subsection D, and any other information the Board determines to be appropriate.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275; 2022, cc. 719, 7452020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-1526.4.
Commonwealth Rail Fund.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that developing and continuing intercity passenger and freight rail operations and the development of rail infrastructure, rolling stock, and support facilities to support intercity passenger and freight rail service are important elements of a balanced transportation system in the Commonwealth and further declares it to be in the public interest that the retention, maintenance, improvement, and development of intercity passenger and freight rail-related infrastructure improvements and operations are essential to the Commonwealth’s continued economic growth, vitality, and competitiveness in national and world markets.

There is hereby established in the state treasury a special nonreverting fund to be known as the Commonwealth Rail Fund (the Fund). The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and shall consist of funds dedicated pursuant to subdivision 3 of §

33.2-1524.1

. Interest earned on moneys in the Fund shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Any moneys remaining in the Fund, including interest thereon, at the end of each fiscal year shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Moneys in the Fund shall be used solely as provided in this section.

The amounts dedicated to the Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1524.1

shall be deposited monthly into the Fund. Thereafter, 93 percent shall be distributed to the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority as soon as practicable for use in accordance with the provisions of Article 6 (§

33.2-287

et seq.) of Chapter 2. The remaining seven percent shall remain in the Fund for the Department of Rail and Public Transportation for planning purposes and for grants for rail projects not administered by the Virginia Passenger Rail Authority. The Department of Rail and Public Transportation may use up to $4 million for the purposes of the Shortline Railway Preservation and Development Fund pursuant to §

33.2-1602

.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

§ 33.2-1526.5.
Commonwealth Port Fund.

There is hereby created in the Department of the Treasury a special nonreverting fund that shall be a part of the Transportation Trust Fund and shall be known as the Commonwealth Port Fund (the Fund).

The Fund shall be established on the books of the Comptroller and the funds remaining in such Fund at the end of a biennium shall not revert to the general fund but shall remain in the Fund. Interest earned on such funds shall remain in the Fund and be credited to it. Funds may be paid to any authority, locality, or commission for the purposes hereinafter specified.

The amounts allocated pursuant to this section shall be allocated by the Board to the Board of Commissioners of the Virginia Port Authority to be used to support port capital needs and the preservation of existing capital needs of all ocean, river, or tributary ports within the Commonwealth. Expenditures for such capital needs are restricted to those capital projects specified in subsection B of §

62.1-132.1

.

Fund revenue shall be allocated by the Board of Commissioners to the Virginia Port Authority in order to foster and stimulate the flow of maritime commerce through the ports of Virginia, including but not limited to the ports of Richmond, Hopewell, and Alexandria.

History.

2020, cc. 1230, 1275.